District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-944

Taxation; annual license fee; basic business license; expedited filing services.

Repealed.

History

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 490, ch. 397, § 44
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(w), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(u), 50 DCR 6913
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2044, 57 DCR 181
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2026, 57 DCR 6242
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-944.
1981 Ed., § 29-1144.
1973 Ed., § 29-844.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 206 of the Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Temporary Act of 2010 (D.C. Law 18-222, September 24, 2010, law notification 57 DCR 9859).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(u) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2044 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2044 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 206 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-450, June 28, 2010, 57 DCR 5635).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 206 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-531, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8109).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2026 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).